Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Handicapped Children

200.400.
Definitions for KRS 200.400 to 200.500. [Repealed.]

200.410.
Commission for Handicapped Children — Appointment — Term — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

200.420.
Qualifications of commission members — Oaths — Expenses. [Repealed.]

200.430.
Corporate power of commission — Officers — Employees — Merit system. [Repealed.]

200.440.
Acceptance of gifts by commission. [Repealed.]

200.450.
Reference of child to commission. [Repealed.]

200.460.
Services provided by Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs — Medical and hospital care — Expenditures — Appeal.

The Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs shall provide through contractual agreement, or otherwise, such services as may be necessary to locate, diagnose, treat, habilitate, or rehabilitate children with disabilities, and may include any necessary auxiliary services, such as room and board and travel for patients and parents or parent substitutes.

Children referred to the care of the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs for treatment shall be placed under the care of those physicians or surgeons that the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs deems qualified and may be placed in a hospital or home properly equipped to render the necessary treatment or services required by the child.

The Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs is authorized to make those expenditures necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and KRS 200.470 to 200.490.

Any administrative appeal of a decision of the office shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 33, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(24); 1978, ch. 384, § 56, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 234, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 405, § 54, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 93, effective July 15, 1996; 2018 ch. 114, § 8, effective July 14, 2018.

200.470.
Conditions of acceptance for children — Payment for care.

No child shall be accepted for care or treatment by the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs if his parents or legal guardian are able to pay for such treatment, except where the child resides in an area of the state where adequate care and treatment are not otherwise available, in which event referral must be made by the doctor caring for the child and the parents or guardian shall reimburse the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs for all cost expended by the office for treatment.

In the event the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs determines that the parents or legal guardian of a child with a disability can pay only a portion of the cost of treatment through their own resources or through resources available to them, such parents or guardian shall pay such sums as they are able to pay and the funds thus received shall be turned over to the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs and applied to the cost of treatment and care of the child.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 33, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(24); 1986, ch. 234, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 405, § 55, effective July 15, 1994; 2018 ch. 114, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

200.480.
Report of Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs.

The Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs shall report the amount of money received and expended and a detailed statement of its activities to the Governor and General Assembly upon request.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 33, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(24); 1986, ch. 234, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 405, § 56, effective July 15, 1994; 2018 ch. 112, § 5, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 114, § 10, effective July 14, 2018.

200.490.
Confidential records — Exception.

All information as to medical data, personal facts, and circumstances obtained by the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs staff shall constitute privileged communications, shall be held confidential and shall not be divulged without the consent of the father, mother, guardian, person who committed the child, or the patient involved, except as may be necessary to provide additional services to children through other medical, welfare or service agencies and institutions. Such information may be disclosed in summary, statistical or other form which does not identify particular individuals.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 33, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 43; 1986, ch. 234, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 405, § 57, effective July 15, 1994; 2018 ch. 114, § 11, effective July 14, 2018.

200.495.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Recipient” means any person who has received medical services provided by the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs or who has received medical services paid for on his behalf by the office;

“Medical services” means medical or medically-related institutional or noninstitutional services which are provided to a recipient or paid for by the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs on behalf of a recipient; and

“Third-party coverage” means any public or private party who is liable to provide medical services or to make medical services benefit payments to a recipient or other provider for medical services provided to a recipient under the terms of any contract, health insurance policy, health insurance plan, settlement, or award.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 274, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 405, § 58, effective July 15, 1994; 2018 ch. 114, § 12, effective July 14, 2018.

200.497.
Third-party coverage for medical services.

Third-party coverage for medical services provided by the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs to clients of the office shall be considered primary coverage in all instances. The office’s liability for coverage for medical services to its clients shall be considered residual to third-party coverage in all instances.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 2018 ch. 114, § 13, effective July 14, 2018.

200.499.
Recovery of costs from third-party payments — Filing of claims.

An applicant for or recipient of medical services provided by or paid for by the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs shall inform the office of any rights that the applicant or recipient has to third-party payments for medical services at the time of initial application for services or at any time thereafter when such third-party payment should become available. The office shall automatically be subrogated to any rights the recipient has to third-party payment for medical services.

The office shall recover the full cost of medical services provided to a recipient and shall recover any payments made for medical services on his behalf directly from:

Any third party liable to make a medical benefit payment to the provider of the recipient’s medical services or to the recipient under the terms and provisions of any contract, health insurance policy, health insurance plan, settlement, or award;

The recipient, if he or she has received third-party payment for medical services that have been provided to him; or

The provider of the recipient’s medical services if third-party payment for medical services has been recovered by the provider.

A recipient of medical services provided by the office or paid for by the office shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the office of any right such recipient has to any payment for such medical services from a third party.

A recipient of medical services provided by the office or paid for by the office shall be deemed to have provided the office the authority to release medical information with respect to such medical services for the purpose of obtaining reimbursement from a third party.

The office may, in order to enforce its subrogation rights under this section, institute, intervene in, or join any legal proceeding against any third party against whom recovery rights arise. No action taken by the office shall operate to deny the recipient recovery for that portion of his damage not subrogated to the office and no action of the recipient shall prejudice the subrogation rights of the office.

When the office provides, pays for, or becomes liable for the medical services, and their costs, of a recipient, it shall have a lien for the full amount of the cost of such medical services upon any and all causes of action which accrue to the recipient or to his legal representatives, as a result of sickness, injury, disease, disability, or death due to the liability of a third party which necessitated the medical service. The office shall have one (1) calendar year from the date when the last item of medical services relative to a specific accident or spell of illness was provided or paid for in which to file its verified lien statement. The statement shall be filed with the clerk of the Circuit Court in the recipient’s county residence. The verified lien statement shall contain the name and address of the recipient of medical services; the date of the injury or accident; the name and address of the vendor or vendors furnishing medical services to the recipient; the date of the medical services; the amount claimed to be due the office for the medical services provided or paid for; and, to the best knowledge of the office, the names and addresses of all persons or corporations claimed to be liable for damages arising from the injuries. The office’s failure to file a lien shall not affect the office’s subrogation rights provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

In recovering any payment in accordance with this action, the office is authorized to make appropriate settlements.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 274, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 2018 ch. 114, § 14, effective July 14, 2018.

200.500.
Transfer of records, property, personnel, funds to commission. [Repealed.]